Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4631
Condemnation motion.

After the public hearing provided for in section 19-4630, the governing body of the city, by majority vote of its members, may vote to exercise the power of eminent domain and condemn the gas system or such portion thereof as described in the motion. The motion shall identify fully and accurately the property subject to the condemnation.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 8.